Georgia statutes. TITLE 31 Health
CHAPTER 3 County Boards of Health

31-3-1.
Creation.

There is established a county board of health in each and every county of this state.

History.

Ga. L. 1914, p. 124, § 2; Code 1933, § 88-201; Ga. L. 1941, p. 317, § 1; Ga. L. 1964, p. 499, § 1.

31-3-2.
Composition; terms of members.

Each county board of health shall be composed of seven members as follows:

One member shall be the chief executive officer of the governing authority of the county, by whatever name called, or some member designated by said officer; in counties where the governing authority is the judge of the probate court of the county, he shall be the member so appointed;

One member shall be the county superintendent of schools or other school personnel may be designated by said superintendent for such time period as determined by the superintendent but not to exceed such superintendent’s contract term;

Except as otherwise provided in this paragraph, one member to be appointed by the governing authority of the county shall be a physician actively practicing medicine in the county and licensed under Chapter 34 of Title 43. If there are fewer than four physicians actively practicing in the county or if there is no physician actively practicing in the county who is willing and able to serve, the governing authority may appoint a person licensed as a nurse or dentist under Chapter 26 or 11, respectively, of Title 43, and actively practicing such profession in the county or any other person having a familiarity with and concern for the provision of medical services in the county;

One member to be appointed by the governing authority of the county shall be a consumer, a representative of a consumer, or a person from an advocacy agency or group, which member will represent on the board the county’s consumers of health services;

One member to be appointed by the governing authority of the largest municipality in the county shall be a person interested in promoting public health who is a consumer or a nurse licensed under Chapter 26 of Title 43;

One member to be appointed by the governing authority of the county shall be a consumer member who will represent on the board the county’s needy, underprivileged, or elderly community; and

One member shall be the chief executive officer of the governing authority of the largest municipality of the county, by whatever name called, or some member designated by said officer; provided, however, that whenever the legal situs of such largest municipality lies within an adjoining county, the county governing authority may adopt an ordinance providing:

For the selection by the county governing authority of the chief executive officer, by whatever name designated, of the governing authority of any municipality lying wholly or partially within the county to fill the position on the county board of health authorized by this paragraph;

That the chief executive officer so selected may designate another member of the respective municipal governing authority, whose term of office is the same as that of the chief executive officer, to serve in the place of the chief executive officer;

That the chief executive officer so selected or the chief executive officer’s designee shall serve for a term of office as a member of the county board of health concurrent with the term of office as a member of the municipal governing authority;

That a vacancy in the position on the county board of health which is held by the chief executive officer or the chief executive officer’s designee shall be filled for the unexpired term by the county governing authority; and

That the first member of the county board of health selected by the county governing authority under such ordinance may take office at any time on or after January 1, 1987, and that the term of office of the member of the county board of health holding office pursuant to this paragraph on December 31, 1986, shall expire on the day immediately preceding the day such first member selected under such ordinance takes office.

No member appointed to the county board of health shall be an employee of the county board of health or of the department.

The terms of the members of county boards of health serving as such on June 30, 1985, and who are serving in membership positions required to be filled by grand jury appointment, shall expire at the end of June 30, 1985, and upon the appointment and qualification of their successors.

The initial term of the member first appointed pursuant to paragraph (3) of subsection (a) of this Code section shall begin July 1, 1985, and shall expire December 31, 1987; the initial term of the member first appointed pursuant to paragraph (4) of subsection (a) of this Code section shall begin July 1, 1985, and shall expire December 31, 1986; the initial term of the member first appointed pursuant to paragraph (6) of subsection (a) of this Code section shall begin July 1, 1984, and expire December 31, 1985; and the initial term of the member first appointed pursuant to paragraph (5) of subsection (a) of this Code section shall begin July 1, 1984, and shall expire December 31, 1986. After these initial terms, members appointed pursuant to paragraphs (3), (4), (5), and (6) of subsection (a) of this Code section shall take office the first day of January immediately following the expiration of the immediately preceding term of that office and serve terms of six years and until their successors are appointed and qualified. Vacancies in any such membership shall be filled, for the unexpired term and until a successor is appointed and qualified, in the same manner as the original appointment.

Persons holding office as members pursuant to paragraph (1), (2), or (7) of subsection (a) of this Code section shall serve as members while holding their offices as chief executive officer of the governing authority of the county, county superintendent of schools, or chief executive officer of the largest municipality of the county, respectively.

In each county having a population of not less than 400,000 and not more than 500,000 according to the United States decennial census of 1990 or any future such census, the superintendent of the largest municipal school system in the county shall serve in an ex officio capacity as an additional member of the county board of health.

History.

Ga. L. 1914, p. 124, § 2; Code 1933, § 88-201; Code 1933, § 88-202, enacted by Ga. L. 1964, p. 499, § 1; Ga. L. 1967, p. 544, § 1; Ga. L. 1982, p. 506, § 1; Ga. L. 1984, p. 1325, § 1; Ga. L. 1985, p. 149, § 31; Ga. L. 1986, p. 1242, § 1; Ga. L. 1987, p. 185, § 1; Ga. L. 1992, p. 1217, § 1; Ga. L. 1993, p. 1445, § 1; Ga. L. 1998, p. 855, § 1.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1986, “who” was deleted preceding “shall” in paragraphs (a)(4) through (a)(6).

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 1993, p. 1445, § 18.1, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “Nothing in this Act shall be construed to repeal any provision of Chapter 5 of Title 37 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, the ‘Community Services Act for the Mentally Retarded.’ ”

31-3-2.1.
[Repealed] Option for certain counties to create board of health and wellness by ordinance.

History.

Repealed by Ga. L. 2016, p. 520, § 1/HB 885, effective April 27, 2016.

Editor’s notes.

This Code section was based on Code 1981, §

31-3-2.1

, enacted by Ga. L. 1985, p. 384, § 1; Ga. L. 1987, p. 169, § 1; Ga. L. 1991, p. 94, § 31; Ga. L. 1998, p. 916, § 1; Ga. L. 2002, p. 1473, § 1.

Ga. L. 2016, p. 520, § 2/HB 885, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “This Act shall become effective upon its approval by the Governor or upon its becoming law without such approval; provided, however, that for any county board of health and wellness which was established by county ordinance pursuant to the former provisions of Code Section 31-3-2.1 and which is still in existence as of the effective date of this Act, the members of such board shall remain in office and such board shall remain in existence until a county board of health is constituted pursuant to Code Section 31-3-2 for such county or until June 30, 2017, whichever occurs first.”

31-3-3.
Duty to inform department of membership.

The county board of health shall keep the department informed of the names, addresses, and terms of office of its members.

History.

Code 1933, § 88-208, enacted by Ga. L. 1964, p. 499, § 1.

31-3-4.
Powers.

The county board of health is empowered to:

Establish and adopt bylaws for its own governance. Meetings shall be held no less frequently than quarterly;

Exercise responsibility and authority in all matters within the county pertaining to health unless the responsibility for enforcement of such is by law that of another agency;

Take such steps as may be necessary to prevent and suppress disease and conditions deleterious to health and to determine compliance with health laws and rules, regulations, and standards adopted thereunder;

Adopt and enforce rules and regulations appropriate to its functions and powers, provided such rules and regulations are not in conflict with the rules and regulations of the department. Such rules and regulations must be reasonably adapted to the purposes intended and must be within the purview of the powers and duties imposed upon the county board of health by this chapter;

Receive and administer all grants, gifts, moneys, and donations for purposes pertaining to health pursuant to this chapter;

Make contracts and establish fees for the provision of public health services provided by county boards of health, including but not limited to environmental health services, which fees may be charged to persons or to establishments and premises within the county for inspection of such establishments, premises, structures and appurtenances thereto, or for other county board of health services. All such fees may be used to defray costs of providing such local services and shall supplement but not replace state or federal funding. No person shall be denied services on the basis of that person’s inability to pay. The scope of services, operating details, contracts, and fees approved by the county board of health shall also be approved by the district director of health. No fees for environmental health services may be charged unless the schedule of fees for such services has been approved by the county governing authority;

Contract with the Department of Public Health or other agencies for assistance in the performance of its functions and the exercise of its powers and for supplying services which are within its purview to perform, provided that such contracts and amendments thereto shall have first been approved by the department. In entering into any contracts to perform its functions and to exercise its powers, and for supplying services which are within its purview to perform, any county board of health or any health district created under the authority of Code Section 31-3-15 shall be considered an agency and such agency shall have the authority to contract with any other county board of health; combination of county boards of health; any other health district; public or private hospitals; hospital authorities; medical schools; training and educational institutions; departments and agencies of the state; county or municipal governments; persons, partnerships, corporations, and associations, public or private; the United States government or the government of any other state; or any other legal entity; and

The county board of health in each county of this state having a population of 400,000 or more according to the United States decennial census of 1990 or any future such census is authorized to develop and implement activities for the prevention of injuries and incorporate injury prevention measures in rules and regulations which are within the purview of the county board of health to promulgate which shall be effective when adopted by an ordinance of the county governing authority.

Notwithstanding the provisions contained in subsection (a) of this Code section and Code Section 31-3-5, nothing contained in this Code section or Code Section 31-3-5 shall be construed to empower a county board of health to adopt any rules or regulations or provisions to enforce any rules or regulations pertaining to matters provided for or otherwise regulated pursuant to the provisions of Part 1 of Article 2 of Chapter 8 of Title 12, the “Georgia Comprehensive Solid Waste Management Act,” as now or hereafter amended, or the rules and regulations promulgated pursuant to such part.

History.

Code 1933, § 88-204, enacted by Ga. L. 1964, p. 499, § 1; Ga. L. 1966, p. 380, § 1; Ga. L. 1976, p. 1420, § 1; Ga. L. 1978, p. 2031, § 1; Ga. L. 1984, p. 1325, § 2; Ga. L. 1985, p. 419, § 1; Ga. L. 1988, p. 1757, § 1; Ga. L. 1992, p. 1204, § 1; Ga. L. 1992, p. 3308, § 1.1; Ga. L. 1993, p. 1445, § 2; Ga. L. 2009, p. 453, § 1-4/HB 228; Ga. L. 2011, p. 705, § 6-3/HB 214.

Cross references.

Regulation of restaurants, taverns, and other establishments by county boards of health and Department of Public Health, §

26-2-370

et seq.

Inspection of funeral establishments by county boards of health, §

43-18-75

.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1992, “such part” was substituted for “such Act” at the end of subsection (b).

Law reviews.

For article on the 2011 amendment of this Code section, see 28 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 147 (2011).

31-3-5.
Functions.

Subject to the provisions of Code Section 31-2A-11 and subsection (b) of this Code section, each county board of health shall have and discharge, within its jurisdiction, subject to any valid local Act which shall remain in force and effect, the following functions:

To determine the health needs and resources of its jurisdiction by research and by collection, analysis, and evaluation of all data pertaining to the health of the community;

To develop, in cooperation with the department, programs, activities, and facilities responsive to the needs of its area;

To secure compliance with the rules and regulations of the department that have local application; and

To enforce, or cause enforcement of, all laws pertaining to health unless the responsibility for the enforcement of such laws is that of another agency.

Each county board of health shall have the power and duty to adopt regulations providing standards and requirements governing the installation of on-site sewage management systems within the incorporated and unincorporated area of the county, subject to the provisions of Code Section 31-2A-11, any rules and regulations promulgated under Code Section 31-2A-11, and subsection (d) of this Code section. Such regulations shall include and be limited to the following:

Specifying the locations within the incorporated and unincorporated area of the county where on-site sewage management systems may be installed;

Specifying the minimum lot size or land area which may be served by an on-site sewage management system based on scientific data regarding on-site sewage management systems;

Specifying the types of residences, buildings, or facilities which may be served by on-site sewage management systems;

Issuing permits for the installation of on-site sewage management systems prior to such installation;

Inspecting on-site sewage management system installations prior to the completion of the installation; and

Providing for ongoing maintenance of such systems, except for nonmechanical residential sewage management systems.

Nothing in this Code section or in Code Section 31-3-5.1 shall limit the power of a county or municipal governing authority to exercise its zoning powers or to establish minimum lot sizes larger than the minimum lot sizes specified pursuant to subsection (b) of this Code section.

Any person may register with the department to conduct soil investigations and prepare soil reports of a site within the state for an on-site sewage management system who meets any one of the following criteria:

Qualifies as a soil classifier as defined in subparagraph (B) of paragraph (3) of this subsection;

Holds a valid certificate of registration as a professional engineer issued pursuant to Chapter 15 of Title 43 and is practicing within his or her area of engineering competency;

Holds a valid certificate of registration as a registered geologist issued pursuant to Chapter 19 of Title 43 and is practicing within his or her area of geologic competency; or

Is a soil and water conservation technician as defined in subparagraph (A) of paragraph (3) of this subsection.

Upon the submission of an evaluation of the suitability of a site within the state for an on-site sewage management system by such a person who is registered with the department, the county board of health shall be required to accept the evaluation unless such evaluation is found by the county board of health to be deficient or questionable. If the county board of health finds such evaluation to be deficient or questionable, the board shall, within three working days of making such finding, issue a written determination stating all deficiencies and all measures needed to correct the deficiencies. A copy of this determination shall be provided to the state director of environmental health.

As used in this subsection, the term:

“Soil and water conservation technician” means a person employed as a soil and water conservation technician by a soil and water conservation district provided for in Article 2 of Chapter 6 of Title 2.

“Soil classifier” means a person who:

Holds at least a bachelor of science degree from an accredited college or university with a major in soil science or a related field of science. This degree shall include 30 semester credit hours or equivalent quarter credit hours in the biological, physical, chemical, and earth sciences with a minimum of 15 semester credit hours or equivalent quarter hours in soil science courses meeting the following distribution:

A minimum of one course in soil classification, morphology, genesis, and mapping; and

The remaining soil science credits must be in at least three of the following eight categories: introductory soil science; soil fertility; soil microbiology; soil chemistry; soil physics; soil management, soils and land use, or soils and the environment; soil mineralogy; or a three credit maximum in independent study, geology, or hydrology; and

Has at least four years of verifiable full-time or equivalent part-time experience under the supervision of a soil classifier who has met the education and experience requirements provided in this subparagraph. Such experience must be obtained after meeting all educational requirements defined in this subparagraph and must have been spent actively mapping, identifying, and classifying soil features and interpreting the influence of soil features on soil uses including, but not limited to, conducting soil investigations for determining the suitability of sites for on-site sewage management systems as approved by the department’s soil classifiers advisory committee; and

Has successfully passed a written examination pertaining to site investigations for on-site sewage management systems administered or approved by the department.

History.

Code 1933, § 88-203, enacted by Ga. L. 1964, p. 499, § 1; Ga. L. 1985, p. 149, § 31; Ga. L. 1997, p. 708, § 2; Ga. L. 2000, p. 549, § 1; Ga. L. 2003, p. 302, § 1; Ga. L. 2009, p. 453, § 1-10/HB 228; Ga. L. 2011, p. 705, § 3-3/HB 214.

Cross references.

Powers and duties of county boards of health with regard to providing of mental health and developmental disabilities services, T. 37, C. 2.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 2000, subparagraphs (d)(1)(A) and (d)(1)(B) (now subparagraphs (d)(3)(A) and (d)(3)(B)) were placed in alphabetical order.

Law reviews.

For article on the 2011 amendment of this Code section, see 28 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 147 (2011).

31-3-5.1.
Conformity prerequisite to building permit.

No building permit for the construction of any residence, building, or other facility which is to be served by a sewage management system shall be issued by or pursuant to the authority of a county governing authority unless the sewage management system installation permit is in conformity with standards contained in Code Section 31-2A-11 for sewage management systems. No person, firm, corporation, or other entity shall install a sewage management system in violation of the provisions of Code Section 31-2A-11 or the regulations of a county board of health adopted pursuant to the authority of Code Section 31-3-5. Each county governing authority shall provide by ordinance or resolution for the enforcement of the provisions of this Code section.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-3-5.1

, enacted by Ga. L. 1986, p. 227, § 1; Ga. L. 1992, p. 3308, § 2; Ga. L. 1994, p. 1777, § 2; Ga. L. 1997, p. 708, § 3; Ga. L. 2009, p. 453, § 1-10/HB 228; Ga. L. 2011, p. 705, § 3-3/HB 214.

Cross references.

Building standards and requirements generally, T. 8, C. 2.

Law reviews.

For article on the 2011 amendment of this Code section, see 28 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 147 (2011).

31-3-5.2.
Definition of “gray water”; lawful use.

As used in this Code section, the term “gray water” means waste water discharged from residential lavatories, bathtubs, showers, clothes washers, and laundry trays.

Private residential direct reuse of gray water shall be lawful if the following conditions are met:

Gray water originating from the residence shall be used and contained within the property boundary for household gardening, composting, lawn watering, or landscape irrigation;

Gray water shall not be used for irrigation of food plants;

The gray water shall not contain hazardous chemicals derived from activities such as cleaning car parts, washing greasy or oily rags, or disposing of waste solutions from home photography laboratories or similar hobbyist or home occupational activities;

The application of gray water shall be managed to minimize standing water on the surface;

The application of gray water shall be outside of a floodway;

The gray water shall not contain water used to wash diapers or similarly soiled or infectious garments unless the gray water is disinfected before irrigation; and

The gray water shall be applied only by hand watering using garden watering cans or similar hand-held containers.

County boards of health shall adopt the provisions of subsection (b) of this Code section by regulation. Local governing bodies shall be authorized to punish violations of said regulations as local ordinance violations, provided that the penalty for each such violation shall not exceed a $100.00 fine.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-3-5.2

, enacted by Ga. L. 2008, p. 720, § 1/SB 463; Ga. L. 2009, p. 8, § 31/SB 46.

31-3-6.
Rules and regulations of local application.

The county board of health shall have authority to establish rules and regulations which apply to all citizens and premises of the county or to specified areas and citizens therein without regard to the remainder of the county.

History.

Code 1933, § 88-205, enacted by Ga. L. 1964, p. 499, § 1.

31-3-7.
Compensation for members’ attendance at meetings.

Members of county boards of health shall be paid not more than $25.00 per day for their attendance at meetings of the board, provided funds therefor have been established by budget and are available from funds allocated to that purpose.

History.

Code 1933, § 88-206, enacted by Ga. L. 1964, p. 499, § 1; Ga. L. 1989, p. 312, § 1.

31-3-8.
Records.

The county board of health shall record and preserve true and correct minutes of its proceedings in a book kept for that purpose and shall maintain or cause to be maintained, unless maintained by the governing authority of the county, accurate double entry accounting records including but not limited to:

Prenumbered duplicates of receipts issued for funds received showing the source of such funds; and

Records and financial reports including a general ledger maintained in accordance with generally accepted principles of accounting and in accordance with such standards as may be prescribed by the governing authority of the county and the department. Such records shall show all receipts and disbursements, identifying each item and, in the case of disbursements, listing to whom paid, dates, amounts, and objects of expenditure. All accounting records shall be subject to any audits made of general county financial operations and shall be made available for the purpose of such audits.

History.

Code 1933, § 88-207, enacted by Ga. L. 1964, p. 499, § 1.

Cross references.

Requirements of audit reports generally, §

36-60-8

.

31-3-9.
Office quarters and equipment.

The governing body of the county shall provide the county board of health with quarters and equipment sufficient for its operation.

History.

Code 1933, § 88-209, enacted by Ga. L. 1964, p. 499, § 1.

31-3-10.
Legal representation.

The county board of health may require the legal services of the county attorney or, its budget permitting, may employ other counsel to assist in performing its duties.

History.

Code 1933, § 88-210, enacted by Ga. L. 1964, p. 499, § 1.

31-3-11.
Appointments of director and staff; supervision.

The county board of health shall appoint as its chief executive officer a director who shall be a physician licensed to practice medicine under Chapter 34 of Title 43 and who otherwise meets the requirements of the rules of the State Personnel Board. The director, subject to the approval of the county board of health, shall designate aides and assistants pursuant to the budget adopted by the county board of health in accordance with Code Section 31-3-14.

Each employee of a county board of health whose duties include enforcing those environmental health laws of this state or environmental health regulations of that board of health relating to septic tanks or individual sewage management systems shall be subject to the direction and supervision of the district director of environmental health, although the hiring and termination from employment of such employee shall be subject to the director of that county board of health. The employment activities of such employee with regard to environmental health shall be reported to the director of environmental health through the district director of environmental health at least quarterly. The director of environmental health may recommend to that director of that county board of health personnel actions, including but not limited to termination, which the director of environmental health deems appropriate for such employee’s failure or refusal to comply with the direction of the director of environmental health in the carrying out of the environmental health employment duties of such employee. As used in this subsection, the term “director of environmental health” means the director of environmental health of the Department of Public Health.

History.

Code 1933, § 88-211, enacted by Ga. L. 1964, p. 499, § 1; Ga. L. 2000, p. 549, § 2; Ga. L. 2009, p. 453, § 1-4/HB 228; Ga. L. 2009, p. 745, § 2/SB 97; Ga. L. 2011, p. 705, § 6-1/HB 214; Ga. L. 2012, p. 446, § 2-35/HB 642.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 2000, “environmental” was substituted for “environment” near the end of the second sentence of subsection (b).

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2012, p. 446, § 3-1/HB 642, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “Personnel, equipment, and facilities that were assigned to the State Personnel Administration as of June 30, 2012, shall be transferred to the Department of Administrative Services on the effective date of this Act.” This Act became effective July 1, 2012.

Ga. L. 2012, p. 446, § 3-2/HB 642, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “Appropriations for functions which are transferred by this Act may be transferred as provided in Code Section 45-12-90.”

Law reviews.

For article on the 2011 amendment of this Code section, see 28 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 147 (2011).

31-3-12.
Duties of director.

Subject to the policies and directives of the county board of health and the policies and directives of the multiple county districts served, the director shall perform the functions and exercise the powers set forth in this chapter except the power to adopt bylaws and to adopt rules and regulations and may delegate the powers and authority conferred, or any part thereof, to one or more individuals as he may deem appropriate. The director shall devote his entire time to the service of the county board of health and to the multiple county districts, where created, and shall be vigilant in procuring compliance with its rules and regulations and with Georgia health laws and rules and regulations adopted thereunder that have application within the county and district. He shall make reports to the county board of health and the agency in charge of the multiple county district in such manner and form and with such frequency as required by it and shall also report to the department in such manner, detail, and form as the department may specify.

History.

Code 1933, § 88-212, enacted by Ga. L. 1964, p. 499, § 1.

31-3-12.1.
Contracts between county boards; authorization for and provisions applicable to county board of health serving as community service board.

In addition to any other power authorized by law, the county governing authority may authorize the county board of health to enter into a contract with the Department of Behavioral Health and Developmental Disabilities or a community mental health, developmental disabilities, and addictive diseases service board created under Chapter 2 of Title 37 to provide certain mental health, developmental disabilities, and addictive diseases services based on the contractual agreement between the parties. In the event that the county governing authority exercises the authority granted by this subsection, the county board of health shall appoint a director for mental health, developmental disabilities, and addictive diseases or a supervisor of the specific service which is being provided by the county board of health, whichever is applicable, who shall meet the requirements established by this subsection. The director for mental health, developmental disabilities, and addictive diseases, or the service supervisor, shall not be required to be a physician and shall be a person other than the director of the county board of health appointed pursuant to Code Section 31-3-11. Further, such director for mental health, developmental disabilities, and addictive diseases or such supervisor of the specific service shall report directly to the county board of health and shall have no formal reporting relationship with the director of the county board of health.

Pursuant to subsection (e) of Code Section 37-2-6, a county governing authority may authorize the membership of a county board of health to serve as the membership of a community mental health, developmental disabilities, and addictive diseases service board, provided that the county governing authority, the county board of health, and any other affected county governing authority act pursuant to subsection (e) of Code Section 37-2-6. If the membership of a county board of health exercises the authority granted pursuant to this subsection and Chapter 2 of Title 37 to serve as the membership of a community service board, the membership of the county board of health shall constitute the membership of the community service board and, at any time that such members are exercising duties and powers related to mental health, developmental disabilities, and addictive diseases, the community service board shall be an independent agency and shall operate in accordance with the provisions of Title 37 as a community service board. Notwithstanding any provisions of law to the contrary, a community service board and a county board of health which have the same membership may contract with each other, provided that any such contract is approved by the department and the Department of Behavioral Health and Developmental Disabilities prior to adoption.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-3-12.1

, enacted by Ga. L. 1993, p. 1445, § 3; Ga. L. 1994, p. 437, § 1; Ga. L. 2002, p. 1324, § 1-3; Ga. L. 2006, p. 310, § 1/HB 1223; Ga. L. 2009, p. 453, § 3-9/HB 228.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 1993, p. 1445, § 18.1, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “Nothing in this Act shall be construed to repeal any provision of Chapter 5 of Title 37 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, the ‘Community Services Act for the Mentally Retarded.’ ”

Ga. L. 2006, p. 310, § 10/HB 1223, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “Nothing in this Act shall be construed to affect or abate any right accrued or vested prior to July 1, 2006, or any action or proceeding commenced prior to July 1, 2006, under any law amended or repealed by this Act.”

Ga. L. 2006, p. 310, § 11/HB 1223, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “This Act shall become effective July 1, 2006, except that those provisions which authorize community service boards to amend their bylaws and authorize county governing authorities to appoint no sooner than May 1, 2006, any community service board members to take office on July 1, 2006, shall become effective upon the approval of this Act by the Governor or upon its becoming law without such approval.”
This Act was approved by the Governor on April 21, 2006.

31-3-13.
Declaration of public policy; contracts for assistance to boards.

No population area or unit of this state shall be without health services responsive to its needs. Because it is recognized that all counties are not equally able to effectuate this policy, a county board of health may contract for assistance in the performance of its functions and exercise of its powers, provided that such proposed contract and any amendments thereto shall have first been approved by the department.

History.

Code 1933, § 88-213, enacted by Ga. L. 1964, p. 499, § 1.

31-3-14.
Financing of expenses.

The county board of health, at a regular or called meeting, at a time appropriate to the fiscal operation of the county, shall determine and fix the amount of money needed for the fiscal or calendar year, as the case may be, in accordance with a budget itemizing anticipated income and expenditure; the budget shall include any unobligated moneys carried over from the current period and funds to be made available from sources other than county taxes. The expenditures anticipated, after applying credits, shall be certified by the county board of health, with a copy of the budget, to the taxing authority of the county, which may fix and levy a tax rate sufficient to raise such amount at the same time and in the same manner prescribed for levying taxes for other county purposes, provided the taxing authority of the county deems the budget reasonable. If, however, the taxing authority of the county should deem the budget unreasonable, it shall promptly return the budget to the county board of health with its objections attached thereto for the purpose of resubmission.

History.

Code 1933, § 88-214, enacted by Ga. L. 1964, p. 499, § 1.

31-3-15.
Establishment of health districts.

The department is authorized, with the consent of the boards of health and the county authorities of the counties involved, to establish health districts composed of one or more counties. The county boards of health of the constituent counties shall, at the call of the commissioner, meet in joint session to approve the selection of a director appointed by the commissioner to serve such boards in common. A county board of health is authorized to appoint one of its members to represent the board at a joint meeting for this purpose. The director shall be a physician who is licensed to practice medicine under Chapter 34 of Title 43 and who otherwise meets the requirements of the rules of the State Personnel Board. The district director shall have the same powers, duties, and responsibility as a director serving a single county board of health. To further the purposes of this Code section, county boards of health may contract with each other for the provision of multicounty services and also exercise any additional powers as authorized by paragraph (7) of subsection (a) of Code Section 31-3-4; and in the performance of such contracts a county board of health may utilize its employees in other counties.

History.

Code 1933, § 88-215, enacted by Ga. L. 1964, p. 499, § 1; Ga. L. 1978, p. 2031, § 2; Ga. L. 2009, p. 745, § 2/SB 97; Ga. L. 2012, p. 446, § 2-36/HB 642.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2012, p. 446, § 3-1/HB 642, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “Personnel, equipment, and facilities that were assigned to the State Personnel Administration as of June 30, 2012, shall be transferred to the Department of Administrative Services on the effective date of this Act.” This Act became effective July 1, 2012.

Ga. L. 2012, p. 446, § 3-2/HB 642, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “Appropriations for functions which are transferred by this Act may be transferred as provided in Code Section 45-12-90.”

31-3-16.
Enforcement under local ordinances.

It is not the intent of this chapter to abrogate the terms of a municipal charter or laws of local application which authorize a governing body within the county to provide penalties for a violation of a valid rule and regulation of the county board of health.

History.

Code 1933, § 88-218, enacted by Ga. L. 1964, p. 499, § 1.